Washington statutes.
RCW 16.68.190

Bait for trapping purposes—Exception.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the department of fish and wildlife from using the carcasses of dead animals for trap bait in their regular trapping operations.

[ 1994 c 264 s 6; 1988 c 36 s 7; 1949 c 100 s 18A; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3142-23.]